Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6970XC (2) 91 as/js S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 915.47 Sexual assault forensic 1 examination center grant program. 2 1. The terms defined in section 915.46 shall have the same 3 meaning when used in this section. 4 2. A sexual assault forensic examination center grant 5 program is established in the department of justice. 6 Contingent upon funding, the attorney general shall contract 7 with an eligible nonprofit organization to operate and maintain 8 sexual assault forensic examination centers in this state. 9 3. A nonprofit organization must comply with all of the 10 following to be eligible for a contract under this section: 11 a. Be a nonprofit organization incorporated in this state 12 pursuant to chapter 504 that is not owned, controlled, or 13 affiliated with any hospital, health system, or inpatient 14 medical facility. 15 b. Employ or otherwise retain services from sexual assault 16 nurse examiners. 17 c. Maintain, or be in the process of establishing, one or 18 more treatment facilities in this state that are primarily 19 dedicated to providing a diverse range of services to sexual 20 assault survivors, including but not limited to medical 21 forensic services. 22 d. Provide services for sexual assault survivors, including 23 providing sexual assault care and related trainings, as the 24 overall primary purpose of the organization. 25 4. The contracting nonprofit organization shall do all of 26 the following: 27 a. Provide services, including medical forensic services, 28 to sexual assault survivors including adults, persons with 29 disabilities, rural Iowans, and other underserved populations. 30 b. Offer or facilitate trainings to law enforcement 31 officers, prosecuting attorneys, health care professionals, and 32 members of the public regarding sexual assault services and 33 sexual assault prevention. 34 c. Provide a cooperative team approach regarding sexual 35 -1- LSB 6970XC (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. _____ assault services, deliver accessible services to sexual assault 1 survivors, and establish an approach that emphasizes the best 2 interests of the sexual assault survivor and that provides 3 investigation, assessment, and rehabilitative services. 4 d. Involve or consult with persons from various professional 5 disciplines who have training and expertise in addressing 6 special types of sexual assault as necessary to address serious 7 cases of sexual assault such as those involving intimate 8 partner violence, dating violence, domestic violence, incest, 9 human trafficking, and drug-facilitated sexual assault. These 10 persons may include but are not limited to physicians and other 11 health care professionals, law enforcement, mental health 12 professionals, social workers, child protection workers, 13 attorneys, juvenile court officers, public health workers, 14 educators, and advocates. 15 e. Submit an annual report to the attorney general and the 16 general assembly no later than January 15 of each calendar 17 year describing, in aggregated and anonymized form, the types 18 of services offered, total number of unduplicated clients 19 served, demographic breakdown of clients served including age, 20 gender, and county of residence, number of individuals by 21 county trained, referrals made to other agencies or services, 22 description of service gaps identified during the reporting 23 period, and barriers to service access identified. 24 5. The requirements in subsection 4 are not intended 25 to restrict or otherwise limit the contracting nonprofit 26 organization from seeking funding or reimbursement from other 27 sources. 28